Illinois, session 104th, HB2327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Labor Law of 2024 is amended by 5changing Section 40 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 206/40)7    Sec. 40. Restrictions on employment of minors. 8    (a) No person shall employ, allow, or permit a minor to 9work: 10        (1) in any mechanic's garage, including garage pits, 11    repairing cars, trucks, or other vehicles or using garage 12    lifting racks;13        (2) in the oiling, cleaning, or wiping of machinery or 14    shafting;15        (3) in or about any mine or quarry;16        (4) in stone cutting or polishing;17        (5) in any factory work;18        (6) in or about any plant manufacturing explosives or 19    articles containing explosive components, or in the use or 20    transportation of same;21        (7) in or about plants manufacturing iron or steel, 22    ore reduction works, smelters, foundries, forging shops, 23    hot rolling mills or any other place in which the heating,   HB2327 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11798 SPS 21887 b1    melting, or heat treatment of metals is carried on;2        (8) in the operation of machinery used in the cold 3    rolling of heavy metal stock, or in the operation of 4    power-driven punching, shearing, stamping, or metal plate 5    bending machines;6        (9) in or about logging, sawmills or lath, shingle, or 7    cooperage-stock mills;8        (10) in the operation of power-driven woodworking 9    machines, or off-bearing from circular saws;10        (11) in the operation and repair of freight elevators 11    or hoisting machines and cranes;12        (12) in spray painting;13        (13) in occupations involving exposure to lead or its 14    compounds;15        (14) in occupations involving exposure to acids, dyes, 16    chemicals, dust, gases, vapors, or fumes that are known or 17    suspected to be dangerous to humans;18        (15) in any occupation subject to the Amusement Ride 19    and Attraction Safety Act;20        (16) in oil refineries, gasoline blending plants, or 21    pumping stations on oil transmission lines;22        (17) in the operation of laundry, dry cleaning, or 23    dyeing machinery;24        (18) in occupations involving exposure to radioactive 25    substances;26        (19) in or about any filling station or service   HB2327 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11798 SPS 21887 b1    station, except that this prohibition does not extend to 2    employment within attached convenience stores, food 3    service, or retail establishments;4        (20) in construction work, including demolition and 5    repair;6        (21) in any energy generation or transmission service;7        (22) in public and private utilities and related 8    services;9        (23) in operations in or in connection with 10    slaughtering, meat packing, poultry processing, and fish 11    and seafood processing;12        (24) in operations which involve working on an 13    elevated surface, with or without use of equipment, 14    including, but not limited to, ladders and scaffolds;15        (25) in security positions or any occupations that 16    require the use or carrying of a firearm or other weapon;17        (26) in occupations which involve the handling or 18    storage of human blood, human blood products, human body 19    fluids, or human body tissues;20        (27) in any mill, cannery, factory, workshop, or coal, 21    brick, or lumber yard;22        (28) any occupation which is prohibited for minors 23    under federal law; or24        (29) in any other occupation or working condition 25    determined by the Director to be hazardous.26    (b) No person shall employ, allow, or permit a minor to   HB2327 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11798 SPS 21887 b1work at:2        (1) any cannabis business establishment subject to the 3    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or Compassionate Use of 4    Medical Cannabis Program Act;5        (2) any establishment subject to the Live Adult 6    Entertainment Facility Surcharge Act;7        (3) any firearm range or gun range used for 8    discharging a firearm in a sporting event, for practice or 9    instruction in the use of a firearm, or the testing of a 10    firearm, except for a scorer age 14 years or older at the 11    World Shooting and Recreational Complex on the dates of 12    the U.S. Open and the Grand American World Trapshooting 13    Championship who is located, during those competitions, at 14    least 15 feet behind the firing line of the trap shooters 15    participating in the competitions;16        (4) any establishment in which items containing 17    alcohol for consumption are manufactured, distilled, 18    brewed, or bottled;19        (5) any establishment where the primary activity is 20    the sale of alcohol or tobacco;21        (6) an establishment operated by any holder of an 22    owners license subject to the Illinois Gambling Act; or23        (7) any other establishment which State or federal law 24    prohibits minors from entering or patronizing.25    (c) An employer shall not allow minors to draw, mix, pour, 26or serve any item containing alcohol or otherwise handle any   HB2327 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11798 SPS 21887 b1open containers of alcohol. An employer shall make reasonable 2efforts to ensure that minors are unable to access alcohol.3    (d) An employer may allow minors aged 14 and 15 to work in 4retail stores, except that an employer shall not allow minors 5to handle or be able to access any goods or products which are 6illegal for minors to purchase or possess.7    (e) No person shall employ, allow, or permit an unlicensed 8minor to perform work in the practice of barber, cosmetology, 9esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology services 10requiring a license under the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, 11Hair Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985, except for 12students enrolled in a school and performing barber, 13cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology 14services in accordance with that Act and rules adopted under 15that Act.16    (f) A person may employ, allow, or permit a minor to 17perform office or administrative support work that does not 18expose the minor to the work prohibited in this Section.19(Source: P.A. 103-721, eff. 1-1-25.)